Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-122] Missing movement. Any
person subject to this chapter who through neglect or design misses the
movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which the person is required in the
course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next